District of Columbia statutes.
31-3932.01

Purpose.

This subchapter provides for the creation of special purpose financial captive insurance companies for the exclusive purpose of facilitating the securitization of one or more risks as a means of accessing alternative sources of capital and achieving the benefits of securitization. Their creation is intended to achieve greater efficiencies in structuring and executing insurance securitizations, to diversify and broaden insurers’ access to sources of capital, to facilitate access for many insurers to insurance securitization and capital markets financing technology, and to further the economic development of the District of Columbia through its captive insurance program.

History

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 201
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-285, § 2(b), 54 DCR 944